Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.440

Testimony of children under age fourteen—Remote testimony—Number of child sexual abuse cases referred for prosecution and number prosecuted—Annual survey—Reports to the legislature.

The criminal justice training commission shall annually survey law enforcement and prosecuting agencies regarding, with respect to the preceding year: (1) The frequency of cases where children under the age of fourteen have elected not to testify, including the reasons for the election not to testify; (2) the number of cases where remote testimony pursuant to RCW 9A.44.150 was used and whether those cases resulted in conviction; and (3) the total number of child sexual abuse cases referred for prosecution and the number of those cases that were prosecuted. The results of the survey described in this section must be reported every other year to the appropriate committees of the legislature with an initial reporting date of December 1, 2015.

[ 2015 c 286 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2015 c 286: See note following RCW 43.101.270.